Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 11. Joint Tenancy

38-11-101.
Personal property in joint tenancy - how created - vesting upon death.

An estate in joint tenancy in personal property is created if, in the instrument evidencing ownership of such property, it is declared that the property is conveyed, transferred, bequeathed, or held in joint tenancy or as joint tenants, whether or not additional words are used relating to tenancy in common or survivorship. The abbreviation “JTWROS” and the phrase “as joint tenants with right of survivorship” or “in joint tenancy with right of survivorship” shall have the same meaning. Upon the death of any such joint tenants, the title to and ownership of such personal property passes immediately to and vests in the surviving joint tenant or tenants. Any grantor or transferor in any such instrument of conveyance or transfer may also be one of the grantees or transferees therein.

Repealed.

Any such instrument evidencing ownership executed prior to July 1, 1996, as amended in compliance with subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to have created an estate in joint tenancy.

History.

Source:
L. 37:

P. 792, § 1.

CSA:

C. 92, § 17.

L. 39:

P. 286, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 76-1-5.

L. 59:

P. 528, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 76-1-5.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 661, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1361, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) repealed, p. 2002, § 66, effective May 22.